Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. ORGANIZATION OF MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE D. GENERAL POWERS OF MUNICIPALITIES

CHAPTER 52. ADOPTION OF MUNICIPAL ORDINANCES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITIES

Sec. 52.001. SUBCHAPTER APPLICABLE TO TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. This subchapter applies only to a Type A general-law municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 52.002. STYLE. (a) The style of an ordinance of the municipality must be: "Be it ordained by the _____________ (insert the name by which the governing body of the municipality is known, such as city council, board of aldermen, or city commission) of the ______________ (insert the type of entity that the municipality is known as, such as city, town, or village) of (insert the name of the municipality)."

(b) The style may be omitted when the ordinance is published in a book or pamphlet.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 402, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 52.003. APPROVAL BY MAYOR AND RELATED CONDITIONS FOR ORDINANCE TO TAKE EFFECT. (a) Before an ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of the municipality may take effect, the ordinance or resolution must be placed in the office of the secretary of the municipality. The mayor shall sign the ordinances and resolutions that the mayor approves.

(b) If the mayor does not sign an ordinance or resolution before the fourth day after the date it is placed in the secretary's office and does not return the ordinance or resolution under Subsection (c), the ordinance or resolution takes effect as provided by law.

(c) If the mayor returns an ordinance or resolution to the governing body with a statement of objections before the fourth day after the date the ordinance or resolution is placed in the secretary's office, the governing body shall, on the return, reconsider the vote by which the ordinance or resolution was adopted. If a majority of the total number of members of the governing body, excluding the mayor, approve the ordinance or resolution on reconsideration and enter the votes in the journal of the governing body's proceedings, the ordinance or resolution may take effect.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 52.004. OFFICIAL NEWSPAPER. (a) As soon as practicable after the beginning of each municipal year, the governing body of the municipality shall contract, as determined by ordinance or resolution, with a public newspaper of the municipality to be the municipality's official newspaper until another newspaper is selected.

(b) The governing body shall publish in the municipality's official newspaper each ordinance, notice, or other matter required by law or ordinance to be published.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER B. PUBLICATION OF ORDINANCES

Sec. 52.011. TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. (a) If a Type A general-law municipality adopts an ordinance that imposes a penalty, fine, or forfeiture, the ordinance, or a caption that summarizes the purpose of the ordinance and the penalty for violating the ordinance, shall be published in:

(1) every issue of the official newspaper for two days; or

(2) one issue of the newspaper if the official newspaper is a weekly paper.

(b) An affidavit by the printer or publisher of the official newspaper verifying the publication shall be filed in the office of the secretary of the municipality. In the courts of this state, the affidavit is prima facie evidence of the adoption of the ordinance and of the required publication.

(c) An ordinance required to be published by this section takes effect when the publication requirement is satisfied unless the ordinance provides otherwise. An ordinance that is not required to be published by this section takes effect when adopted unless the ordinance provides otherwise.

(d) If a Type A general-law municipality publishes its ordinances in pamphlet or book form, the publication in the official newspaper of an ordinance included in the pamphlet or book is not required if the ordinance was published previously in the official newspaper. A court shall admit without further proof an ordinance of a Type A general-law municipality that is published in pamphlet or book form as authorized by the governing body if the ordinance was published previously in the official newspaper.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 52.012. TYPE B GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. (a) Before an ordinance or a bylaw of a Type B general-law municipality may be enforced, the ordinance or bylaw, or a caption that summarizes the purpose of the ordinance or bylaw and the penalty for violating the ordinance or bylaw must be posted in three public places in the municipality or published in a newspaper that is published in the municipality. If no newspaper is published in the municipality, the ordinance, bylaw, or summary may be published in a newspaper with general circulation in the municipality.

(b) Unless the publication is in a weekly newspaper, the governing body must post or publish the ordinance, bylaw, or summary for at least two days. If the publication is in a weekly newspaper, the governing body shall publish the ordinance, bylaw, or summary in one issue.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 194, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 52.013. HOME-RULE MUNICIPALITIES. (a) The governing body of a home-rule municipality may publish a caption of an adopted ordinance that summarizes the purpose of the ordinance and any penalty for violating the ordinance in lieu of a requirement in the municipality's charter that the text of the ordinance be published.

(b) If the charter of a home-rule municipality does not provide for the method of publication of an ordinance, the full text of the ordinance or a caption that summarizes the purpose of the ordinance and the penalty for violating the ordinance may be published at least twice in the municipality's official newspaper.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.